North Carolina, session 2025, SB201.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. The Charter of the Town of Pineville, being Chapter 296 of the Session
Laws of 1965, as amended, is amended by adding a new section to read:
"Sec. 17.A. Reserve Police Division. In addition to any auxiliary police department
established pursuant to G.S. 160A-282, the town may establish a reserve police division whose
officers may be compensated for any active duty time. The town council shall fix the amount of
compensation for officers in the reserve police division and cause the compensation to be paid."
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law.
*S201-v-1*